Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 202677-23,100
Deposits in excess of insured or guaranteed amount; qualified trustee; duties.

(1) Any bank, capital stock financial institution, or qualifying mutual financial institution in which public money or public funds have been deposited which satisfies its requirement to secure the deposit of public money or public funds in excess of the amount insured or guaranteed by the Federal Deposit Insurance Corporation, in whole or in part, by the deposit, pledge, or granting of a security interest in a single pool of securities shall designate a qualified trustee and place with the trustee for holding the securities so deposited, pledged, or in which a security interest has been granted pursuant to subsection (1) of section 77-2398, subject to the order of the director or the administrator. The bank, capital stock financial institution, or qualifying mutual financial institution shall give written notice of the designation of the qualified trustee to any governmental unit depositing public money or public funds for which such securities are deposited, pledged, or in which a security interest has been granted, and if an affiliate of the bank, capital stock financial institution, or qualifying mutual financial institution is to serve as the qualified trustee, the notice shall disclose the affiliate relationship and shall be given prior to designation of the qualified trustee. The director or administrator shall accept the written receipt of the qualified trustee describing the pool of securities so deposited, pledged, or in which a security interest has been granted by the bank, capital stock financial institution, or qualifying mutual financial institution, a copy of which shall also be delivered to the bank, capital stock financial institution, or qualifying mutual financial institution.

(2) Any bank, capital stock financial institution, or qualifying mutual financial institution which satisfies its requirement to secure the deposit of public money or public funds in excess of the amount insured or guaranteed by the Federal Deposit Insurance Corporation under the Public Funds Deposit Security Act, in whole or in part, by providing a deposit guaranty bond pursuant to the provisions of subsection (1) of section 77-2398, shall designate the director and cause to be issued a deposit guaranty bond which runs to the director acting for the benefit of the governmental units having public money or public funds on deposit with such bank, capital stock financial institution, or qualifying mutual financial institution and which is conditioned that the bank, capital stock financial institution, or qualifying mutual financial institution shall render to the administrator the statement required under subsection (3) of this section.

(3) Each bank, capital stock financial institution, or qualifying mutual financial institution which satisfies its requirement to secure the deposit of public money or public funds in excess of the amount insured or guaranteed by the Federal Deposit Insurance Corporation by providing a deposit guaranty bond or by depositing, pledging, or granting a security interest in a single pool of securities, or any combination thereof, shall, on or before the tenth day of each month, render to the administrator a statement showing as of the last business day of the previous month (a) the amount of public money or public funds deposited in such bank, capital stock financial institution, or qualifying mutual financial institution that is not insured or guaranteed by the Federal Deposit Insurance Corporation (i) by each governmental unit separately and (ii) by all governmental units in the aggregate and (b) the total value of the deposit guaranty bond and the aggregate market value of the pool of securities deposited, pledged, or in which a security interest has been granted pursuant to subsection (1) of section 77-2398. The director shall be authorized, acting for the benefit of the governmental units having public money or public funds on deposit with such bank, capital stock financial institution, or qualifying mutual financial institution, to take any and all actions necessary to take title to or to effect a first perfected security interest in the securities deposited, pledged, or in which a security interest is granted.

(4) Within twenty days after the deadline for receiving the statement required under subsection (3) of this section from a bank, capital stock financial institution, or qualifying mutual financial institution, the administrator shall provide a report to each governmental unit listed in such statement reflecting (a) the amount of public money or public funds deposited in such bank, capital stock financial institution, or qualifying mutual financial institution by each governmental unit as of the last business day of the previous month that is not insured or guaranteed by the Federal Deposit Insurance Corporation and that is secured pursuant to subsection (1) of section 77-2398 and (b) the total value of the deposit guaranty bond and the aggregate market value of the pool of securities deposited, pledged, or in which a security interest is granted pursuant to subsection (1) of section 77-2398 as of the last business day of the previous month. The report shall clearly notify the governmental unit if the value of the deposit guaranty bond provided or the securities deposited, pledged, or in which a security interest has been granted, or any combination thereof, do not meet the statutory requirement. The report required by this subsection shall be deemed to have been provided to a governmental unit upon posting of the report by the administrator on its website for access by governmental units participating under the single bank pooled method if the governmental unit has agreed in advance to receive such report by accessing the administrator's website.

Laws 2000, LB 932, § 45;

Laws 2001, LB 362, § 94;

Laws 2009, LB259, § 32;

Laws 2019, LB622, § 11;

Laws 2020, LB909, § 53;

Laws 2021, LB66, § 7.